Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1728
Marketing plan; payment secured; buy-back arrangement; representations; prohibited; exception.

In selling, leasing, or offering to sell or lease a seller-assisted marketing plan in this state, sellers of such plans shall not represent that a purchaser's initial payment is secured in any manner or to any degree or that the seller provides a buy-back arrangement unless the seller has, in conformity with section 59-1751, either obtained a surety bond issued by a surety company admitted to do business in this state or established a trust account.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 28;

Laws 1995, LB 599, § 17.